Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1031.
do enact as follows:AB1031,14Section 1. 77.51 (4f) of the statutes is created to read:AB1031,2,2577.51 (4f) “Grooming and hygiene products” means soaps and cleaning 1solutions, shampoo, toothpaste, mouthwash, antiperspirants, and suntan lotions 2and screens.AB1031,23Section 2. 77.51 (7jm) of the statutes is created to read:AB1031,2,11477.51 (7jm) “Menstrual discharge collection devices” means tampons, panty 5liners, menstrual cups, pads, period underwear, and other similar tangible personal 6property designed for use in connection with the human menstrual cycle. 7“Menstrual discharge collection devices” includes clothing, as defined in s. 77.54 8(67) (a) 1., that is marketed specifically for use as menstrual discharge collection 9devices for the human menstrual cycle, such as period swimwear, period running 10shorts, and period sleep shorts. “Menstrual discharge collection devices” does not 11include grooming and hygiene products.AB1031,312Section 3. 77.52 (13) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1031,2,241377.52 (13) For the purpose of the proper administration of this section and to 14prevent evasion of the sales tax it shall be presumed that all receipts are subject to 15the tax until the contrary is established. The burden of proving that a sale of 16tangible personal property, or items, property, or goods under sub. (1) (b), (c), or (d), 17or services is not a taxable sale at retail is upon the person who makes the sale 18unless that person takes from the purchaser an electronic or a paper certificate, in 19a manner prescribed by the department, to the effect that the property, item, good, 20or service is purchased for resale or is otherwise exempt, except that no certificate is 21required for the sale of tangible personal property, or items, property, or goods 22under sub. (1) (b), (c), or (d), or services that are exempt under s. 77.54 (5) (a) 3., (7), 23(7m), (8), (10), (11), (14), (15), (17), (20n), (21), (22b), (31), (32), (35), (36), (37), (42), 24(44), (45), (46), (51), (52), (64), (66), (67), (71), and (72), and (76).AB1031,41Section 4. 77.53 (10) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1031,3,15277.53 (10) For the purpose of the proper administration of this section and to 3prevent evasion of the use tax and the duty to collect the use tax, it is presumed 4that tangible personal property, or items, property, or goods under s. 77.52 (1) (b), 5(c), or (d), or taxable services sold by any person for delivery in this state is sold for 6storage, use, or other consumption in this state until the contrary is established. 7The burden of proving the contrary is upon the person who makes the sale unless 8that person takes from the purchaser an electronic or paper certificate, in a manner 9prescribed by the department, to the effect that the property, or items, property, or 10goods under s. 77.52 (1) (b), (c), or (d), or taxable service is purchased for resale, or 11otherwise exempt from the tax, except that no certificate is required for the sale of 12tangible personal property, or items, property, or goods under s. 77.52 (1) (b), (c), or 13(d), or services that are exempt under s. 77.54 (7), (7m), (8), (10), (11), (14), (15), (17), 14(20n), (21), (22b), (31), (32), (35), (36), (37), (42), (44), (45), (46), (51), (52), (64), (66), 15(67), (71), and (72), and (76).AB1031,516Section 5. 77.54 (76) of the statutes is created to read:AB1031,3,181777.54 (76) The sales price from the sale of and the storage, use, or other 18consumption of menstrual discharge collection devices.AB1031,619Section 6. Effective date.AB1031,3,2120(1) This act takes effect on the first day of the 3rd month beginning after 21publication.AB1031,3,2222